South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1. Act 602 of 1992 is amended by adding a subsection at the end to read: (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to the millage and budget limitations contained in this act, beginning with Fiscal Year 2025-2026, the budget for the School District of Greenville County is subject to approval by the Greenville County Council. The board of trustees of the district shall submit the proposed budget for the upcoming fiscal year to the county council no later than May thirty-first of each year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----